Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Coal Authority

152A.300.
Definitions for KRS 152A.300 to 152A.325. [Repealed.]

152A.305.
Kentucky Coal Authority. [Repealed.]

152A.310.
Terms of members. [Repealed.]

152A.315.
Duties and functions of authority. [Repealed.]

152A.320.
Powers of authority. [Repealed.]

152A.325.
Revenue bonds. [Repealed.]